Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201744-523
Automobile liability insurance policy; cancellation; notice; exceptions.

(1)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(b) of this section, a notice of cancellation, given for reasons other than for nonpayment of premium, of a policy of automobile liability insurance issued or delivered in this state shall only be effective if mailed by registered mail, certified mail, or first-class mail using intelligent mail barcode or another similar tracking method used or approved by the United States Postal Service to the named insured at the address shown in the policy at least thirty days prior to the effective date of such cancellation.

(b) A notice of cancellation, initiated by a premium finance company, of a policy of automobile liability insurance issued or delivered in this state shall only be effective if mailed by registered mail, certified mail, or first-class mail using intelligent mail barcode or another similar tracking method used or approved by the United States Postal Service to the named insured at the address shown in the policy at least ten days prior to the effective date of such cancellation.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) An insurer's substitution of insurance upon renewal which results in substantially equivalent coverage shall not be considered a cancellation of a policy; and

(b) The transfer of a policyholder between insurers within the same insurance group shall be considered a cancellation of a policy only if the transfer results in policy coverage or rates substantially less favorable to the insured.

(3) This section shall not apply (a) to any policy subject to sections 44-514 to 44-521, (b) to any policy issued under an automobile assigned risk plan or to any policy of insurance issued principally to cover personal or premises liability of an insured even though such insurance may also provide some incidental coverage for liability arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle on the premises of the insured or on the ways adjoining such premises, and (c) to any policy or coverage which has been in effect less than sixty days at the time notice of cancellation is mailed or delivered by the insurer unless it is a renewal policy.

(4) Any attempted cancellation in violation of the provisions of this section shall be void.

Laws 1972, LB 481, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 390, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 44-379.01;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 127;

Laws 1999, LB 326, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 360, § 6;

Laws 2017, LB406, § 3.

This section governs cancellation of automobile liability policies which are not included in section 44-514. Glockel v. State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co., 219 Neb. 222, 361 N.W.2d 559 (1985).